New York, session 2025-2026, S9729.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 345-e to 2 read as follows: 3 § 345-e. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated as the 4 Donald Roy McAnn Memorial Highway. All that portion of the state highway 5 system constituting state route nine hundred forty-one-A in the town of 6 Greece, county of Monroe, known as Latta Road, beginning at its inter- 7 section with Dewey Avenue, continuing in a generally easterly direction, 8 and terminating at its intersection with Fairway Drive, shall be dedi- 9 cated to Donald Roy McAnn. 10 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 11 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 12 as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act, provided that such 13 signing shall state "Highway Dedicated to Donald Roy McAnn". However, 14 to avoid confusion and to limit any possible disruption of commerce, the 15 dedication called for pursuant to section one of this act shall be one 16 of ceremonial nature and the official name of such highway shall not be 17 changed as a result of this act. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15308-04-6